New Mexico, session 2026, HB323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the office of broadband access and expansion for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years to assist low-income persons to have access to affordable broadband service when those persons live in an unincorporated area or in a city, a town or an incorporated area with a population of twenty thousand or less as reflected in the most recent federal decennial census; on land within the exterior boundaries of a reservation or pueblo grant of an Indian nation, tribe or pueblo; or on land held in trust by the United States for an Indian nation, tribe or pueblo. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. - 2 -